Ohio, session 136, HB417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 109.803, 955.54, 955.99, 959.131, 959.99, 2921.321, and 2929.18 be amended and sections 955.55, 955.56, and 955.57 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 109.803. (A)(1) Subject to divisions (A)(2) and (B) of this section, every appointing authority shall require each of its appointed peace officers and troopers to complete twenty-four hours of continuing professional training each calendar year. Twenty-four hours is intended to be a minimum requirement, and appointing authorities are encouraged to exceed the twenty-four hour minimum. A minimum of twenty-four hours of continuing professional training shall be reimbursed each calendar year and a maximum of forty hours of continuing professional training may be reimbursed each calendar year. At least two hours of such continuing professional training shall be dedicated to the education of laws governing animal welfare and cruelty under Chapter 959. of the Revised Code. (2) An appointing authority may submit a written request to the peace officer training commission that requests for a calendar year because of emergency circumstances an extension of the time within which one or more of its appointed peace officers or troopers must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission, as described in division (A)(1) of this section. A request made under this division shall set forth the name of each of the appointing authority's peace officers or troopers for whom an extension is requested, identify the emergency circumstances related to that peace officer or trooper, include documentation of those emergency circumstances, and set forth the date on which the request is submitted to the commission. A request shall be made under this division not later than the fifteenth day of December in the calendar year for which the extension is requested. Upon receipt of a written request made under this division, the executive director of the commission shall review the request and the submitted documentation. If the executive director of the commission is satisfied that emergency circumstances exist for any peace officer or trooper for whom a request was made under this division, the executive director may approve the request for that peace officer or trooper and grant an extension of the time within which that peace officer or trooper must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission. An extension granted under this division may be for any period of time the executive director believes to be appropriate, and the executive director shall specify in the notice granting the extension the date on which the extension ends. Not later than thirty days after the date on which a request is submitted to the commission, for each peace officer and trooper for whom an extension is requested, the executive director either shall approve the request and grant an extension or deny the request and deny an extension and shall send to the appointing authority that submitted the request written notice of the executive director's decision. If the executive director grants an extension of the time within which a particular appointed peace officer or trooper of an appointing authority must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission, the appointing authority shall require that peace officer or trooper to complete the required minimum number of hours of training not later than the date on which the extension ends. (B) With the advice of the Ohio peace officer training commission, the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code rules setting forth minimum standards for continuing professional training for peace officers and troopers and governing the administration of continuing professional training programs for peace officers and troopers. The rules adopted by the attorney general under division (B) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Allow peace officers and troopers to earn credit for up to four hours of continuing professional training for time spent while on duty providing drug use prevention education training that utilizes evidence-based curricula to students in school districts, community schools established under Chapter 3314., STEM schools established under Chapter 3326., and college-preparatory boarding schools established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (2) Allow a peace officer or trooper appointed by a law enforcement agency to earn hours of continuing professional training for other peace officers or troopers appointed by the law enforcement agency by providing drug use prevention education training under division (B)(1) of this section so that hours earned by the peace officer or trooper providing the training in excess of four hours may be applied to offset the number of continuing professional training hours required of another peace officer or trooper appointed by that law enforcement agency. (3) Prohibit the use of continuing professional training hours earned under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section from being used to offset any mandatory hands-on training requirement. (4) Require a peace officer to complete training on proper interactions with civilians during traffic stops and other in-person encounters, which training shall have an online offering and shall include all of the following topics: (a) A person's rights during an interaction with a peace officer, including all of the following: (i) When a peace officer may require a person to exit a vehicle; (ii) Constitutional protections from illegal search and seizure; (iii) The rights of a passenger in a vehicle who has been pulled over for a traffic stop; (iv) The right for a citizen to record an encounter with a peace officer. (b) Proper actions for interacting with a civilian and methods for diffusing a stressful encounter with a civilian; (c) Laws regarding questioning and detention by peace officers, including any law requiring a person to present proof of identity to a peace officer, and the consequences for a person's or officer's failure to comply with those laws; (d) Any other requirements and procedures necessary for the proper implementation of this section. (C) The attorney general shall transmit a certified copy of any rule adopted under this section to the secretary of state. (D) As used in this section: (1) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 109.71 of the Revised Code. (2) "Trooper" means an individual appointed as a state highway patrol trooper under section 5503.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Appointing authority" means any agency or entity that appoints a peace officer or trooper. Sec. 955.54. (A) No person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony offense of violence committed on or after the effective date of this section May 22, 2012, or a felony violation of any provision of Chapter 959., 2923., or 2925. of the Revised Code committed on or after the effective date of this section May 22, 2012, shall knowingly own, possess, have custody of, or reside in a residence with either of the following for a period of three years commencing either upon the date of release of the person from any period of incarceration imposed for the offense or violation or, if the person is not incarcerated for the offense or violation, upon the date of the person's final release from the other sanctions imposed for that the person plead guilty to or was convicted of the offense or violation: (1) An unspayed or unneutered dog older than twelve weeks of age; (2) Any dog that has been determined to be a dangerous dog under Chapter 955. of the Revised Code. (B) A person described in division (A) of this section shall microchip for permanent identification any dog owned, possessed by, or in the custody of the person. (C)(1) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any person who is confined in a correctional institution of the department of rehabilitation and correction. (2) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any person with respect to any dog that the person owned, possessed, had custody of, or resided in a residence with prior to the effective date of this section May 22, 2012. Sec. 955.55. (A) As used in this section, "animal abuse offense" means a violation of section 959.01, 959.02, 959.03, 959.06, 959.13, 959.131, 959.14, 959.15, 959.16, 959.17, 959.18, 959.20, 959.21, or 2921.321 of the Revised Code. (B) No person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony animal abuse offense committed on or after the effective date of this section shall knowingly own, possess, have custody of, or reside in a residence with any dog. (C) No person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a misdemeanor animal abuse offense committed on or after the effective date of this section shall knowingly own, possess, have custody of, or reside in a residence with any dog for a period of two years commencing either upon the date of release of the person from any period of incarceration imposed for the offense or, if the person is not incarcerated for the offense, upon the date that the person is convicted of or pleads guilty to the offense. (D) Upon a person being convicted of or pleading guilty to a felony or misdemeanor animal abuse offense, the applicable court shall, within a reasonable period of time, notify the auditor of state of such conviction or guilty plea. (E) The auditor of state shall establish a "Do Not Adopt" registry of all persons described in divisions (B) and (C) of this section. A person described in division (C) of this section shall only be on the registry for the two-year period that the person is prohibited from owning, possessing, having custody of, or residing in a residence with any dog as specified in that division. The auditor of state shall make such registry publicly available via its web site. Sec. 955.56. (A) The director of agriculture shall establish a statewide dangerous and vicious dog registry that lists the name and address of every person who has been issued a dangerous dog registration certificate from a county auditor under this chapter. The director shall make the registry publicly available on the department of agriculture's web site. (B) Each county auditor, not more than ninety days after the effective date of this section, shall submit a list of the names and corresponding addresses of every person who has been issued a dangerous dog registration certificate to the director. Thereafter, each county auditor shall notify the director in a timely manner of any new person who registers a dangerous or vicious dog with the county auditor. A county auditor also shall notify the director whenever the county auditor becomes aware of an address change for a dangerous or vicious dog. (C) A person may petition the director, in a manner established by the director, to have the person's name and address removed from the registry if the person transfers ownership of the dangerous or vicious dog or if the dangerous or vicious dog dies. Sec. 955.57. Prior to adopting out or transferring ownership of a dog, a dog pound operated by a municipal corporation or by a county under this chapter or a humane society established in accordance with Chapter 1717. of the Revised Code shall ensure that the dog has been spayed or neutered. Sec. 955.99. (A)(1) Whoever violates division (E) of section 955.11 of the Revised Code because of a failure to comply with division (B) of that section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (2) Whoever violates division (E) of section 955.11 of the Revised Code because of a failure to comply with division (C) or (D) of that section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense and of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (B) Whoever violates section 955.10, 955.23, 955.24, or 955.25 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (C) Whoever violates section 955.261, 955.39, or 955.50 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense and of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (D) Whoever violates division (F) of section 955.16 or division (B) of section 955.43 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (E)(1) Whoever violates section 955.21 of the Revised Code, violates division (B) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code, or commits a violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code that involves a dog that is not a nuisance dog, dangerous dog, or vicious dog shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars or more than one hundred dollars on a first offense, and on each subsequent offense shall be fined not less than seventy-five dollars or more than two hundred fifty dollars and may be imprisoned for not more than thirty days. (2) In addition to the penalties prescribed in division (E)(1) of this section, if the offender is guilty of a violation of division (B) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code or a violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code that involves a dog that is not a nuisance dog, dangerous dog, or vicious dog, the court may order the offender to personally supervise the dog that the offender owns, keeps, or harbors, to cause that dog to complete dog obedience training, or to do both. (F)(1) Whoever commits a violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code that involves a nuisance dog is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on the first offense and of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense involving the same dog. Upon a person being convicted of or pleading guilty to a third violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code involving the same dog, the court shall require the offender to register the involved dog as a dangerous dog. (2) In addition to the penalties prescribed in division (F)(1) of this section, if a violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code involves a nuisance dog, the court may order the offender to personally supervise the nuisance dog that the offender owns, keeps, or harbors, to cause that dog to complete dog obedience training, or to do both. (G) Whoever commits a violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code that involves a dangerous dog or a violation of division (D) of that section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on a first offense and of a misdemeanor of the third degree on each subsequent offense. Additionally, the court may order the offender to personally supervise the dangerous dog that the offender owns, keeps, or harbors, to cause that dog to complete dog obedience training, or to do both, and the court may order the offender to obtain liability insurance pursuant to division (E) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code. The court, in the alternative, may order the dangerous dog to be humanely destroyed by a licensed veterinarian, the county dog warden, or the county humane society at the owner's expense. With respect to a violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code that involves a dangerous dog, until the court makes a final determination and during the pendency of any appeal of a violation of that division and at the discretion of the dog warden, the dog shall be confined or restrained in accordance with division (D) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code or at the county dog pound at the owner's expense. (H)(1) Whoever commits a violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code that involves a vicious dog is guilty of one of the following: (a) A felony of the fourth degree if the dog kills a person. Additionally, the court shall order that the vicious dog be humanely destroyed by a licensed veterinarian, the county dog warden, or the county humane society at the owner's expense. (b) A misdemeanor of the first degree if the dog causes serious injury to a person. Additionally, the court may order the vicious dog to be humanely destroyed by a licensed veterinarian, the county dog warden, or the county humane society at the owner's expense. (2) If the court does not order the vicious dog to be destroyed under division (H)(1)(b) of this section, the court shall issue an order that specifies that division (D) of section 955.11 and divisions (D) to (I) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code apply with respect to the dog and the owner, keeper, or harborer of the dog as if the dog were a dangerous dog and that section 955.54 of the Revised Code applies with respect to the dog as if it were a dangerous dog. As part of the order, the court shall order the offender to obtain the liability insurance required under division (E)(1) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code in an amount, exclusive of interest and costs, that equals or exceeds one hundred thousand dollars. Until the court makes a final determination and during the pendency of any appeal of a violation of division (C) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code and at the discretion of the dog warden, the dog shall be confined or restrained in accordance with the provisions described in division (D) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code or at the county dog pound at the owner's expense. (I) Whoever violates division (A)(2) of section 955.01 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (J) Whoever violates division (E)(2) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (K) Whoever violates division (C) of section 955.221 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate offense. Fines levied and collected for violations of that division shall be distributed by the mayor or clerk of the municipal or county court in accordance with section 733.40, division (F) of section 1901.31, or division (C) of section 1907.20 of the Revised Code to the treasury of the county, township, or municipal corporation whose resolution or ordinance was violated. (L) Whoever violates division (F)(1), (2), or (3) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. Additionally, the court shall order that the dog involved in the violation be humanely destroyed by a licensed veterinarian, the county dog warden, or the county humane society. Until the court makes a final determination and during the pendency of any appeal of a violation of division (F)(1), (2), or (3) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code and at the discretion of the dog warden, the dog shall be confined or restrained in accordance with the provisions of division (D) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code or at the county dog pound at the owner's expense. (M) Whoever violates division (E)(1), (3), or (4) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (N) Whoever violates division (I)(4) of section 955.22 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (O) Whoever violates division (A) or (B) of section 955.54 or division (B) or (C) of section 955.55 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (P)(1) If a dog is confined at the county dog pound pursuant to division (G), (H), or (L) of this section, the county dog warden shall give written notice of the confinement to the owner of the dog. If the county dog warden is unable to give the notice to the owner of the dog, the county dog warden shall post the notice on the door of the residence of the owner of the dog or in another conspicuous place on the premises at which the dog was seized. The notice shall include a statement that a security in the amount of one hundred dollars is due to the county dog warden within ten days to secure payment of all reasonable expenses, including medical care and boarding of the dog for sixty days, expected to be incurred by the county dog pound in caring for the dog pending the determination. The county dog warden may draw from the security any actual costs incurred in caring for the dog. (2) If the person ordered to post security under division (P)(1) of this section does not do so within ten days of the confinement of the animal, the dog is forfeited, and the county dog warden may determine the disposition of the dog unless the court issues an order that specifies otherwise. (3) Not more than ten days after the court makes a final determination under division (G), (H), or (L) of this section, the county dog warden shall provide the owner of the dog with the actual cost of the confinement of the dog. If the county dog warden finds that the security provided under division (P)(1) of this section is less than the actual cost of confinement of the dog, the owner shall remit the difference between the security provided and the actual cost to the county dog warden within thirty days after the court's determination. If the county dog warden finds that the security provided under division (P)(1) of this section is greater than that actual cost, the county dog warden shall remit the difference between the security provided and the actual cost to the owner within thirty days after the court's determination. (Q) As used in this section, "nuisance dog," "dangerous dog," and "vicious dog" have the same meanings as in section 955.11 of the Revised Code. Sec. 959.131. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Companion animal" means any animal that is kept inside a residential dwelling and any dog or cat regardless of where it is kept, including a pet store as defined in section 956.01 of the Revised Code. "Companion animal" does not include livestock or any wild animal. (2) "Cruelty," "torment," and "torture" have the same meanings as in section 1717.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Residential dwelling" means a structure or shelter or the portion of a structure or shelter that is used by one or more humans for the purpose of a habitation. (4) "Practice of veterinary medicine" has the same meaning as in section 4741.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Wild animal" has the same meaning as in section 1531.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Federal animal welfare act" means the "Laboratory Animal Act of 1966," Pub. L. No. 89-544, 80 Stat. 350 (1966), 7 U.S.C.A. 2131 et seq., as amended by the "Animal Welfare Act of 1970," Pub. L. No. 91-579, 84 Stat. 1560 (1970), the "Animal Welfare Act Amendments of 1976," Pub. L. No. 94-279, 90 Stat. 417 (1976), and the "Food Security Act of 1985," Pub. L. No. 99-198, 99 Stat. 1354 (1985), and as it may be subsequently amended. (7) "Dog kennel" means an animal rescue for dogs, a boarding kennel, or a training kennel. (8) "Boarding kennel" and "animal rescue for dogs" have the same meanings as in section 956.01 of the Revised Code. (9) "Training kennel" means an establishment operating for profit that keeps, houses, and maintains dogs for the purpose of training the dogs in return for a fee or other consideration. (10) "Livestock" means horses, mules, and other equidae; cattle, sheep, goats, and other bovidae; swine and other suidae; poultry; alpacas; llamas; captive white-tailed deer; and any other animal that is raised or maintained domestically for food or fiber. (11) "Captive white-tailed deer" has the same meaning as in section 1531.01 of the Revised Code. (12) "Serious physical harm" means any of the following: (a) Physical harm that carries an unnecessary or unjustifiable substantial risk of death; (b) Physical harm that involves either partial or total permanent incapacity; (c) Physical harm that involves acute pain of a duration that results in substantial suffering or that involves any degree of prolonged or intractable pain. (B) No person shall knowingly torture, torment, needlessly mutilate or maim, cruelly beat, poison, needlessly kill, or commit an act of cruelty against a companion animal. (C) No person shall knowingly cause serious physical harm to a companion animal. (D) No person who confines or who is the custodian or caretaker of a companion animal shall negligently do any of the following: (1) Torture, torment, or commit an act of cruelty against the companion animal; (2) Deprive the companion animal of necessary sustenance or confine the companion animal without supplying it during the confinement with sufficient quantities of good, wholesome food and water if it can reasonably be expected that the companion animal would become sick or suffer in any other way as a result of or due to the deprivation or confinement; (3) Impound or confine the companion animal without affording it, during the impoundment or confinement, with access to shelter from heat, cold, wind, rain, snow, or excessive direct sunlight if it can reasonably be expected that the companion animal would become sick or suffer in any other way as a result of or due to the lack of adequate shelter. (E) No person who confines or who is the custodian or caretaker of a companion animal shall recklessly deprive the companion animal of necessary sustenance or confine the companion animal without supplying it during the confinement with sufficient quantities of good, wholesome food and water. (F) No owner, manager, or employee of a dog kennel who confines or is the custodian or caretaker of a companion animal shall knowingly do any of the following: (1) Torture, torment, needlessly mutilate or maim, cruelly beat, poison, needlessly kill, or commit an act of cruelty against the companion animal; (2) Deprive the companion animal of necessary sustenance or confine the companion animal without supplying it during the confinement with sufficient quantities of good, wholesome food and water if it is reasonably expected that the companion animal would die or experience unnecessary or unjustifiable pain or suffering as a result of the deprivation or confinement; (3) Impound or confine the companion animal without affording it, during the impoundment or confinement, with access to shelter from heat, cold, wind, rain, snow, or excessive direct sunlight if it is reasonably expected that the companion animal would die or experience unnecessary or unjustifiable pain or suffering as a result of or due to the lack of adequate shelter. (G) No owner, manager, or employee of a dog kennel who confines or is the custodian or caretaker of a companion animal shall negligently do any of the following: (1) Torture, torment, or commit an act of cruelty against the companion animal; (2) Deprive the companion animal of necessary sustenance or confine the companion animal without supplying it during the confinement with sufficient quantities of good, wholesome food and water if it can reasonably be expected that the companion animal would become sick or suffer in any other way as a result of or due to the deprivation or confinement; (3) Impound or confine the companion animal without affording it, during the impoundment or confinement, with access to shelter from heat, cold, wind, rain, snow, or excessive direct sunlight if it can reasonably be expected that the companion animal would become sick or suffer in any other way as a result of or due to the lack of adequate shelter. (H) No person, except as authorized by law, shall knowingly treat a companion animal corpse in a way that would outrage reasonable community sensibilities. (I) Divisions (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), and (G) to (H) of this section do not apply to any of the following: (1) A companion animal used in scientific research conducted by an institution in accordance with the federal animal welfare act and related regulations; (2) The lawful practice of veterinary medicine by a person who has been issued a license, temporary permit, or registration certificate to do so under Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code; (3) Dogs being used or intended for use for hunting or field trial purposes, provided that the dogs are being treated in accordance with usual and commonly accepted practices for the care of hunting dogs; (4) The use of common training devices, if the companion animal is being treated in accordance with usual and commonly accepted practices for the training of animals; (5) The administering of medicine to a companion animal that was properly prescribed by a person who has been issued a license, temporary permit, or registration certificate under Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code. (I) (J) Notwithstanding any section of the Revised Code that otherwise provides for the distribution of fine moneys, the clerk of court shall forward all fines the clerk collects that are so imposed for any violation of this section to the treasurer of the political subdivision or the state, whose county humane society or law enforcement agency is to be paid the fine money as determined under this division. The treasurer to whom the fines are forwarded shall pay the fine moneys to the county humane society or the county, township, municipal corporation, or state law enforcement agency in this state that primarily was responsible for or involved in the investigation and prosecution of the violation. If a county humane society receives any fine moneys under this division, the county humane society shall use the fine moneys either to provide the training that is required for humane society agents under section 1717.061 of the Revised Code or to provide additional training for humane society agents. Sec. 959.99. (A) Whoever violates section 959.18 or 959.19 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates section 959.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree. If the value of the animal killed or the injury done amounts to three hundred dollars or more, whoever violates section 959.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (C) Whoever violates section 959.03, 959.06, division (C) of section 959.09, 959.12, or 959.17 or division (A) of section 959.15 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (D) Whoever violates division (A) of section 959.13 or section 959.21 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree. In addition, the court may order the offender to forfeit the animal or livestock and may provide for its disposition, including, but not limited to, the sale of the animal or livestock. If an animal or livestock is forfeited and sold pursuant to this division, the proceeds from the sale first shall be applied to pay the expenses incurred with regard to the care of the animal from the time it was taken from the custody of the former owner. The balance of the proceeds from the sale, if any, shall be paid to the former owner of the animal. (E)(1) Whoever violates division (B) or (E) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and a felony of the fifth degree on each subsequent offense. (2) Whoever violates division (C) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. (3) Whoever violates section 959.01 of the Revised Code or division (D) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. (4) Whoever violates division (F) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. (5) Whoever violates division (G) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (6)(a) (6) Whoever violates division (H) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and a felony of the fifth degree on a second or subsequent offense. In addition, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to such a violation, the court shall impose a requirement that the offender undergo psychological evaluation or counseling in addition to any other criminal penalty. The court shall order the offender to pay the costs of the evaluation or counseling. (7)(a) A court may order a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 959.131 of the Revised Code to forfeit to an impounding agency, as defined in section 959.132 of the Revised Code, any or all of the companion animals in that person's ownership or care. The court also may prohibit or place limitations on the person's ability to own or care for any companion animals for a specified or indefinite period of time. (b) A court may order a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A) of section 959.13 or section 959.131 of the Revised Code to reimburse an impounding agency for the reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the agency for the care of an animal or livestock that the agency impounded as a result of the investigation or prosecution of the violation, provided that the costs were not otherwise paid under section 959.132 of the Revised Code. (7) (8) If a court has reason to believe that a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 959.131 or 959.21 of the Revised Code has a mental or emotional disorder that contributed to the violation, the court may impose as a community control sanction or as a condition of probation a requirement that the offender undergo psychological evaluation or counseling. The court shall order the offender to pay the costs of the evaluation or counseling. (F) Whoever violates section 959.14 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. (G) Whoever violates section 959.05 or 959.20 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (H) Whoever violates section 959.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree for a first offense and a felony of the third degree on each subsequent offense. (I) Whoever violates division (B) or (C) of section 959.15 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony and shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars. (J)(1) As used in divisions (J)(2) and (3) of this section, "animal abuse offense" means a violation of section 959.01, 959.02, 959.03, 959.06, 959.13, 959.131, 959.14, 959.15, 959.16, 959.17, 959.18, 959.20, or 959.21 of the Revised Code. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the court shall impose as a financial sanction a mandatory fine of two thousand five hundred dollars if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to an animal abuse offense that is a misdemeanor or a fifth degree felony. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a fourth degree felony animal abuse offense or a third degree felony animal abuse offense, the court shall impose as a financial sanction a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars and not more than the maximum financial sanction allowed under section 2929.18 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2921.321. (A) No person shall knowingly cause, or attempt to cause, physical harm to a police dog or horse in either of the following circumstances: (1) The police dog or horse is assisting a law enforcement officer in the performance of the officer's official duties at the time the physical harm is caused or attempted. (2) The police dog or horse is not assisting a law enforcement officer in the performance of the officer's official duties at the time the physical harm is caused or attempted, but the offender has actual knowledge that the dog or horse is a police dog or horse. (B) No person shall recklessly do any of the following: (1) Taunt, torment, or strike a police dog or horse; (2) Throw an object or substance at a police dog or horse; (3) Interfere with or obstruct a police dog or horse, or interfere with or obstruct a law enforcement officer who is being assisted by a police dog or horse, in a manner that does any of the following: (a) Inhibits or restricts the law enforcement officer's control of the police dog or horse; (b) Deprives the law enforcement officer of control of the police dog or horse; (c) Releases the police dog or horse from its area of control; (d) Enters the area of control of the police dog or horse without the consent of the law enforcement officer, including placing food or any other object or substance into that area; (e) Inhibits or restricts the ability of the police dog or horse to assist a law enforcement officer. (4) Engage in any conduct that is likely to cause serious physical injury or death to a police dog or horse; (5) If the person is the owner, keeper, or harborer of a dog, fail to reasonably restrain the dog from taunting, tormenting, chasing, approaching in a menacing fashion or apparent attitude of attack, or attempting to bite or otherwise endanger a police dog or horse that at the time of the conduct, the police dog or horse is assisting a law enforcement officer in the performance of the officer's duties or that the person knows is a police dog or horse. (C) No person shall knowingly cause, or attempt to cause, physical harm to an assistance dog in either of the following circumstances: (1) The dog, at the time the physical harm is caused or attempted, is assisting or serving a person who is blind, deaf, or hearing impaired or a person with a mobility impairment. (2) The dog, at the time the physical harm is caused or attempted, is not assisting or serving a person who is blind, deaf, or hearing impaired or a person with a mobility impairment, but the offender has actual knowledge that the dog is an assistance dog. (D) No person shall recklessly do any of the following: (1) Taunt, torment, or strike an assistance dog; (2) Throw an object or substance at an assistance dog; (3) Interfere with or obstruct an assistance dog, or interfere with or obstruct a person who is blind, deaf, or hearing impaired or a person with a mobility impairment who is being assisted or served by an assistance dog, in a manner that does any of the following: (a) Inhibits or restricts the assisted or served person's control of the dog; (b) Deprives the assisted or served person of control of the dog; (c) Releases the dog from its area of control; (d) Enters the area of control of the dog without the consent of the assisted or served person, including placing food or any other object or substance into that area; (e) Inhibits or restricts the ability of the dog to assist the assisted or served person. (4) Engage in any conduct that is likely to cause serious physical injury or death to an assistance dog; (5) If the person is the owner, keeper, or harborer of a dog, fail to reasonably restrain the dog from taunting, tormenting, chasing, approaching in a menacing fashion or apparent attitude of attack, or attempting to bite or otherwise endanger an assistance dog that at the time of the conduct is assisting or serving a person who is blind, deaf, or hearing impaired or a person with a mobility impairment or that the person knows is an assistance dog. (E)(1) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of assaulting a police dog or horse, and shall be punished as provided in divisions (E)(1)(a) and (b) of this section. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, assaulting a police dog or horse is a misdemeanor of the second degree. If the violation results in the death of the police dog or horse, assaulting a police dog or horse is a felony of the third degree and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term one of the definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree. If the violation results in serious physical harm to the police dog or horse other than its death, assaulting a police dog or horse is a felony of the fourth degree. If the violation results in physical harm to the police dog or horse other than death or serious physical harm, assaulting a police dog or horse is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (b) In addition to any other sanction imposed for assaulting a police dog or horse, if the violation of division (A) of this section results in the death of the police dog or horse, the sentencing court shall impose as a financial sanction a mandatory fine under division (B)(10) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code. The fine shall be paid to the law enforcement agency that was served by the police dog or horse that was killed, and shall be used by that agency only for one or more of the following purposes: (i) If the dog or horse was not owned by the agency, the payment to the owner of the dog or horse of the cost of the dog or horse and the cost of the training of the dog or horse to qualify it as a police dog or horse, if that cost has not previously been paid by the agency; (ii) After payment of the costs described in division (E)(1)(b)(i) of this section, if applicable, payment of the cost of replacing the dog or horse that was killed; (iii) After payment of the costs described in division (E)(1)(b)(i) of this section, if applicable, payment of the cost of training the replacement dog or horse to qualify it as a police dog or horse; (iv) After payment of the costs described in division (E)(1)(b)(i) of this section, if applicable, payment of the cost of further training of the replacement dog or horse that is needed to train it to the level of training that had been achieved by the dog or horse that was killed. (2) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of harassing a police dog or horse. Except as otherwise provided in this division, harassing a police dog or horse is a misdemeanor of the second degree. If the violation results in the death of the police dog or horse, harassing a police dog or horse is a felony of the third degree. If the violation results in serious physical harm to the police dog or horse, but does not result in its death, harassing a police dog or horse, is a felony of the fourth degree. If the violation results in physical harm to the police dog or horse, but does not result in its death or in serious physical harm to it, harassing a police dog or horse is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (3) Whoever violates division (C) of this section is guilty of assaulting an assistance dog. Except as otherwise provided in this division, assaulting an assistance dog is a misdemeanor of the second degree. If the violation results in the death of the assistance dog, assaulting an assistance dog is a felony of the third degree. If the violation results in serious physical harm to the assistance dog other than its death, assaulting an assistance dog is a felony of the fourth degree. If the violation results in physical harm to the assistance dog other than death or serious physical harm, assaulting an assistance dog is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (4) Whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of harassing an assistance dog. Except as otherwise provided in this division, harassing an assistance dog is a misdemeanor of the second degree. If the violation results in the death of the assistance dog, harassing an assistance dog is a felony of the third degree. If the violation results in serious physical harm to the assistance dog, but does not result in its death, harassing an assistance dog is a felony of the fourth degree. If the violation results in physical harm to the assistance dog, but does not result in its death or in serious physical harm to it, harassing an assistance dog is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (5) In addition to any other sanction or penalty imposed for the offense under this section, Chapter 2929., or any other provision of the Revised Code, whoever violates division (A), (B), (C), or (D) of this section is responsible for the payment of all of the following: (a) Any veterinary bill or bill for medication incurred as a result of the violation by the police department regarding a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section or by the person who is blind, deaf, or hearing impaired or the person with a mobility impairment assisted or served by the assistance dog regarding a violation of division (C) or (D) of this section; (b) The cost of any damaged equipment that results from the violation; (c) If the violation did not result in the death of the police dog or horse or the assistance dog that was the subject of the violation and if, as a result of that dog or horse being the subject of the violation, the dog or horse needs further training or retraining to be able to continue in the capacity of a police dog or horse or an assistance dog, the cost of any further training or retraining of that dog or horse by a law enforcement officer or by the person who is blind, deaf, or hearing impaired or the person with a mobility impairment assisted or served by the assistance dog; (d) If the violation resulted in the death of the assistance dog that was the subject of the violation or resulted in serious physical harm to the police dog or horse or the assistance dog or horse that was the subject of the violation to the extent that the dog or horse needs to be replaced on either a temporary or a permanent basis, the cost of replacing that dog or horse and of any further training of a new police dog or horse or a new assistance dog by a law enforcement officer or by the person who is blind, deaf, or hearing impaired or the person with a mobility impairment assisted or served by the assistance dog, which replacement or training is required because of the death of or the serious physical harm to the dog or horse that was the subject of the violation. (F) (F)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and in addition to any costs imposed under division (E)(5) of this section, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a misdemeanor offense under this section, the court shall impose as a financial sanction a mandatory fine of two thousand five hundred dollars. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and in addition to any costs imposed under division (E)(5) of this section, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a fourth degree or a third degree felony offense under this section, other than a felony offense described in division (E)(1)(a) of this section, the court shall impose as a financial sanction a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars and not more than the maximum financial sanction allowed under section 2929.18 of the Revised Code. (G) This section does not apply to a licensed veterinarian whose conduct is in accordance with Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code. (G)(H) This section only applies to an offender who knows or should know at the time of the violation that the police dog or horse or assistance dog that is the subject of a violation under this section is a police dog or horse or an assistance dog. (H) (I) As used in this section: (1) "Physical harm" means any injury, illness, or other physiological impairment, regardless of its gravity or duration. (2) "Police dog or horse" means a dog or horse that has been trained, and may be used, to assist law enforcement officers in the performance of their official duties. (3) "Serious physical harm" means any of the following: (a) Any physical harm that carries a substantial risk of death; (b) Any physical harm that causes permanent maiming or that involves some temporary, substantial maiming; (c) Any physical harm that causes acute pain of a duration that results in substantial suffering. (4) "Assistance dog," "blind," and "person with a mobility impairment" have the same meanings as in section 955.011 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2929.18. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this division and in addition to imposing court costs pursuant to section 2947.23 of the Revised Code, the court imposing a sentence upon an offender for a felony may sentence the offender to any financial sanction or combination of financial sanctions authorized under this section or, in the circumstances specified in section 2929.32 of the Revised Code, may impose upon the offender a fine in accordance with that section, and shall sentence the offender to make restitution pursuant to this section and section 2929.281 of the Revised Code. The victim has a right not to seek restitution. Financial sanctions that either are required to be or may be imposed pursuant to this section include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) Restitution by the offender to the victim of the offender's criminal offense or the victim's estate, in an amount based on the victim's economic loss. In open court, the court shall order that full restitution be made to the victim, to the adult probation department that serves the county on behalf of the victim, to the clerk of courts, or to another agency designated by the court. At sentencing, the court shall determine the amount of restitution to be made by the offender. The victim, victim's representative, victim's attorney, if applicable, the prosecutor or the prosecutor's designee, and the offender may provide information relevant to the determination of the amount of restitution. The amount the court orders as restitution shall not exceed the amount of the economic loss suffered by the victim as a direct and proximate result of the commission of the offense. If the court imposes restitution for the cost of accounting or auditing done to determine the extent of economic loss, the court may order restitution for any amount of the victim's costs of accounting or auditing provided that the amount of restitution is reasonable and does not exceed the value of property or services stolen or damaged as a result of the offense. The court shall hold a hearing on restitution if the offender, victim, victim's representative, or victim's estate disputes the amount. The court shall determine the amount of full restitution by a preponderance of the evidence. All restitution payments shall be credited against any recovery of economic loss in a civil action brought by the victim or the victim's estate against the offender. The court may order that the offender pay a surcharge of not more than five per cent of the amount of the restitution otherwise ordered to the entity responsible for collecting and processing restitution payments. The victim, victim's estate, or victim's attorney, if applicable, may file a motion or request that the prosecutor in the case file a motion, or the offender may file a motion, for modification of the payment terms of any restitution ordered. If the court grants the motion, it may modify the payment terms as it determines appropriate but shall not reduce the amount of restitution ordered, except as provided in division (A) of section 2929.281 of the Revised Code. The court shall not discharge restitution until it is fully paid by the offender. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(1), (3), or (4) of this section, a fine payable by the offender to the state, to a political subdivision, or as described in division (B)(2) of this section to one or more law enforcement agencies, with the amount of the fine based on a standard percentage of the offender's daily income over a period of time determined by the court and based upon the seriousness of the offense. A fine ordered under this division shall not exceed the maximum conventional fine amount authorized for the level of the offense under division (A)(3) of this section. (3) Except as provided in division (B)(1), (3), or (4) of this section, a fine payable by the offender to the state, to a political subdivision when appropriate for a felony, or as described in division (B)(2) of this section to one or more law enforcement agencies, in the following amount: (a) For a felony of the first degree, not more than twenty thousand dollars; (b) For a felony of the second degree, not more than fifteen thousand dollars; (c) For a felony of the third degree, not more than ten thousand dollars; (d) For a felony of the fourth degree, not more than five thousand dollars; (e) For a felony of the fifth degree, not more than two thousand five hundred dollars. (4) A state fine or costs as defined in section 2949.111 of the Revised Code. (5)(a) Reimbursement by the offender of any or all of the costs of sanctions incurred by the government, including the following: (i) All or part of the costs of implementing any community control sanction, including a supervision fee under section 2951.021 of the Revised Code; (ii) All or part of the costs of confinement under a sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.14, 2929.142, or 2929.16 of the Revised Code, provided that the amount of reimbursement ordered under this division shall not exceed the total amount of reimbursement the offender is able to pay as determined at a hearing and shall not exceed the actual cost of the confinement; (iii) All or part of the cost of purchasing and using an immobilizing or disabling device, including a certified ignition interlock device, or a remote alcohol monitoring device that a court orders an offender to use under section 4510.13 of the Revised Code. (b) If the offender is sentenced to a sanction of confinement pursuant to section 2929.14 or 2929.16 of the Revised Code that is to be served in a facility operated by a board of county commissioners, a legislative authority of a municipal corporation, or another local governmental entity, if, pursuant to section 307.93, 341.14, 341.19, 341.23, 753.02, 753.04, 753.16, 2301.56, or 2947.19 of the Revised Code and section 2929.37 of the Revised Code, the board, legislative authority, or other local governmental entity requires prisoners to reimburse the county, municipal corporation, or other entity for its expenses incurred by reason of the prisoner's confinement, and if the court does not impose a financial sanction under division (A)(5)(a)(ii) of this section, confinement costs may be assessed pursuant to section 2929.37 of the Revised Code. In addition, the offender may be required to pay the fees specified in section 2929.38 of the Revised Code in accordance with that section. (c) Reimbursement by the offender for costs pursuant to section 2929.71 of the Revised Code; (d) Reimbursement by the offender for costs pursuant to section 2917.321 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) For a first, second, or third degree felony violation of any provision of Chapter 2925., 3719., or 4729. of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory fine of at least one-half of, but not more than, the maximum statutory fine amount authorized for the level of the offense pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section. If an offender alleges in an affidavit filed with the court prior to sentencing that the offender is indigent and unable to pay the mandatory fine and if the court determines the offender is an indigent person and is unable to pay the mandatory fine described in this division, the court shall not impose the mandatory fine upon the offender. (2) Any mandatory fine imposed upon an offender under division (B)(1) of this section and any fine imposed upon an offender under division (A)(2) or (3) of this section for any fourth or fifth degree felony violation of any provision of Chapter 2925., 3719., or 4729. of the Revised Code shall be paid to law enforcement agencies pursuant to division (F) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code. (3) For a fourth degree felony OVI offense and for a third degree felony OVI offense, the sentencing court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory fine in the amount specified in division (G)(1)(d) or (e) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable. The mandatory fine so imposed shall be disbursed as provided in the division pursuant to which it is imposed. (4) Notwithstanding any fine otherwise authorized or required to be imposed under division (A)(2) or (3) or (B)(1) of this section or section 2929.31 of the Revised Code for a violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code, in addition to any penalty or sanction imposed for that offense under section 2925.03 or sections 2929.11 to 2929.18 of the Revised Code and in addition to the forfeiture of property in connection with the offense as prescribed in Chapter 2981. of the Revised Code, the court that sentences an offender for a violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code may impose upon the offender a fine in addition to any fine imposed under division (A)(2) or (3) of this section and in addition to any mandatory fine imposed under division (B)(1) of this section. The fine imposed under division (B)(4) of this section shall be used as provided in division (H) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code. A fine imposed under division (B)(4) of this section shall not exceed whichever of the following is applicable: (a) The total value of any personal or real property in which the offender has an interest and that was used in the course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through conduct in violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code, including any property that constitutes proceeds derived from that offense; (b) If the offender has no interest in any property of the type described in division (B)(4)(a) of this section or if it is not possible to ascertain whether the offender has an interest in any property of that type in which the offender may have an interest, the amount of the mandatory fine for the offense imposed under division (B)(1) of this section or, if no mandatory fine is imposed under division (B)(1) of this section, the amount of the fine authorized for the level of the offense imposed under division (A)(3) of this section. (5) Prior to imposing a fine under division (B)(4) of this section, the court shall determine whether the offender has an interest in any property of the type described in division (B)(4)(a) of this section. Except as provided in division (B)(6) or (7) of this section, a fine that is authorized and imposed under division (B)(4) of this section does not limit or affect the imposition of the penalties and sanctions for a violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code prescribed under those sections or sections 2929.11 to 2929.18 of the Revised Code and does not limit or affect a forfeiture of property in connection with the offense as prescribed in Chapter 2981. of the Revised Code. (6) If the sum total of a mandatory fine amount imposed for a first, second, or third degree felony violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code under division (B)(1) of this section plus the amount of any fine imposed under division (B)(4) of this section does not exceed the maximum statutory fine amount authorized for the level of the offense under division (A)(3) of this section or section 2929.31 of the Revised Code, the court may impose a fine for the offense in addition to the mandatory fine and the fine imposed under division (B)(4) of this section. The sum total of the amounts of the mandatory fine, the fine imposed under division (B)(4) of this section, and the additional fine imposed under division (B)(6) of this section shall not exceed the maximum statutory fine amount authorized for the level of the offense under division (A)(3) of this section or section 2929.31 of the Revised Code. The clerk of the court shall pay any fine that is imposed under division (B)(6) of this section to the county, township, municipal corporation, park district as created pursuant to section 511.18 or 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or state law enforcement agencies in this state that primarily were responsible for or involved in making the arrest of, and in prosecuting, the offender pursuant to division (F) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code. (7) If the sum total of the amount of a mandatory fine imposed for a first, second, or third degree felony violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code plus the amount of any fine imposed under division (B)(4) of this section exceeds the maximum statutory fine amount authorized for the level of the offense under division (A)(3) of this section or section 2929.31 of the Revised Code, the court shall not impose a fine under division (B)(6) of this section. (8)(a) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2907.21, 2907.22, or 2923.32, division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2907.323 involving a minor, or division (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1422 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender knowingly committed the offense in furtherance of human trafficking, the sentencing court shall sentence the offender to a financial sanction of restitution by the offender to the victim or the victim's estate, with the restitution including the costs of housing, counseling, and medical and legal assistance incurred by the victim as a direct result of the offense and the greater of the following: (i) The gross income or value to the offender of the victim's labor or services; (ii) The value of the victim's labor as guaranteed under the minimum wage and overtime provisions of the "Federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938," 52 Stat. 1060, 20 U.S.C. 207, and state labor laws. (b) If a court imposing sentence upon an offender for a felony is required to impose upon the offender a financial sanction of restitution under division (B)(8)(a) of this section, in addition to that financial sanction of restitution, the court may sentence the offender to any other financial sanction or combination of financial sanctions authorized under this section, including a restitution sanction under division (A)(1) of this section. (9) In addition to any other fine that is or may be imposed under this section, the court imposing sentence upon an offender for a felony that is a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense, as those terms are defined in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code, may impose a fine of not less than fifty nor more than five hundred dollars. (10) For a felony violation of division (A) of section 2921.321 of the Revised Code that results in the death of the police dog or horse that is the subject of the violation, the sentencing court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory fine from the range of fines provided under division (A)(3) of this section for a felony of the third degree, but such fine shall not be less than two thousand five hundred dollars. A mandatory fine imposed upon an offender under division (B)(10) of this section shall be paid to the law enforcement agency that was served by the police dog or horse that was killed in the felony violation of division (A) of section 2921.321 of the Revised Code to be used as provided in division (E)(1)(b) of that section. (11) In addition to any other fine that is or may be imposed under this section, the court imposing sentence upon an offender for any of the following offenses that is a felony may impose a fine of not less than seventy nor more than five hundred dollars, which, except as provided in division (B)(12) of this section, shall be transmitted to the treasurer of state to be credited to the address confidentiality program fund created by section 111.48 of the Revised Code: (a) Domestic violence; (b) Menacing by stalking; (c) Rape; (d) Sexual battery; (e) Trafficking in persons; (f) A violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2907.21, 2907.22, or 2923.32, division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2907.323 involving a minor, or division (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code, if the offender also is convicted of a specification of the type described in section 2941.1422 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender knowingly committed the offense in furtherance of human trafficking. (12)(a) A court that imposes a fine under division (B)(11) of this section may retain up to twenty-five per cent of amounts collected in satisfaction of the fine to cover administrative costs. (b) A court that imposes a fine under division (B)(11) of this section may assign up to twenty-five per cent of amounts collected in satisfaction of the fine to reimburse the prosecuting attorney for costs associated with prosecution of the offense. (C)(1) Except as provided in section 2951.021 of the Revised Code, the offender shall pay reimbursements imposed upon the offender pursuant to division (A)(5)(a) of this section to pay the costs incurred by a county pursuant to any sanction imposed under this section or section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code or in operating a facility used to confine offenders pursuant to a sanction imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code to the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall deposit the reimbursements in the sanction cost reimbursement fund that each board of county commissioners shall create in its county treasury. The county shall use the amounts deposited in the fund to pay the costs incurred by the county pursuant to any sanction imposed under this section or section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code or in operating a facility used to confine offenders pursuant to a sanction imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code. (2) Except as provided in section 2951.021 of the Revised Code, the offender shall pay reimbursements imposed upon the offender pursuant to division (A)(5)(a) of this section to pay the costs incurred by a municipal corporation pursuant to any sanction imposed under this section or section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code or in operating a facility used to confine offenders pursuant to a sanction imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code to the treasurer of the municipal corporation. The treasurer shall deposit the reimbursements in a special fund that shall be established in the treasury of each municipal corporation. The municipal corporation shall use the amounts deposited in the fund to pay the costs incurred by the municipal corporation pursuant to any sanction imposed under this section or section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code or in operating a facility used to confine offenders pursuant to a sanction imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code. (3) Except as provided in section 2951.021 of the Revised Code, the offender shall pay reimbursements imposed pursuant to division (A)(5)(a) of this section for the costs incurred by a private provider pursuant to a sanction imposed under this section or section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code to the provider. (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a financial sanction imposed pursuant to division (A) or (B) of this section is a judgment in favor of the state or a political subdivision in which the court that imposed the financial sanction is located, and the offender subject to the financial sanction is the judgment debtor. A financial sanction of reimbursement imposed pursuant to division (A)(5)(a)(ii) of this section upon an offender who is incarcerated in a state facility or a municipal jail is a judgment in favor of the state or the municipal corporation, and the offender subject to the financial sanction is the judgment debtor. A financial sanction of reimbursement imposed upon an offender pursuant to this section for costs incurred by a private provider of sanctions is a judgment in favor of the private provider, and the offender subject to the financial sanction is the judgment debtor. A financial sanction of a mandatory fine imposed under division (B)(10) of this section that is required under that division to be paid to a law enforcement agency is a judgment in favor of the specified law enforcement agency, and the offender subject to the financial sanction is the judgment debtor. A financial sanction of restitution imposed pursuant to division (A)(1) or (B)(8) of this section is an order in favor of the victim of the offender's criminal act that can be collected through a certificate of judgment as described in division (D)(1) of this section, through execution as described in division (D)(2) of this section, or through an order as described in division (D)(3) of this section, and the offender shall be considered for purposes of the collection as the judgment debtor. Imposition of a financial sanction and execution on the judgment does not preclude any other power of the court to impose or enforce sanctions on the offender. Once the financial sanction is imposed as a judgment or order under this division, the victim, private provider, state, or political subdivision may do any of the following: (1) Obtain from the clerk of the court in which the judgment was entered, at no cost, a certificate of judgment that shall be in the same manner and form as a certificate of judgment issued in a civil action; (2) Obtain execution of the judgment or order through any available procedure, including: (a) An execution against the property of the judgment debtor under Chapter 2329. of the Revised Code; (b) An execution against the person of the judgment debtor under Chapter 2331. of the Revised Code; (c) A proceeding in aid of execution under Chapter 2333. of the Revised Code, including: (i) A proceeding for the examination of the judgment debtor under sections 2333.09 to 2333.12 and sections 2333.15 to 2333.27 of the Revised Code; (ii) A proceeding for attachment of the person of the judgment debtor under section 2333.28 of the Revised Code; (iii) A creditor's suit under section 2333.01 of the Revised Code. (d) The attachment of the property of the judgment debtor under Chapter 2715. of the Revised Code; (e) The garnishment of the property of the judgment debtor under Chapter 2716. of the Revised Code. (3) Obtain an order for the assignment of wages of the judgment debtor under section 1321.33 of the Revised Code. (E) A court that imposes a financial sanction upon an offender may hold a hearing if necessary to determine whether the offender is able to pay the sanction or is likely in the future to be able to pay it. (F) Each court imposing a financial sanction upon an offender under this section or under section 2929.32 of the Revised Code may designate the clerk of the court or another person to collect the financial sanction. The clerk or other person authorized by law or the court to collect the financial sanction may enter into contracts with one or more public agencies or private vendors for the collection of, amounts due under the financial sanction imposed pursuant to this section or section 2929.32 of the Revised Code. Before entering into a contract for the collection of amounts due from an offender pursuant to any financial sanction imposed pursuant to this section or section 2929.32 of the Revised Code, a court shall comply with sections 307.86 to 307.92 of the Revised Code. (G) If a court that imposes a financial sanction under division (A) or (B) of this section finds that an offender satisfactorily has completed all other sanctions imposed upon the offender and that all restitution that has been ordered has been paid as ordered, the court may suspend any financial sanctions imposed pursuant to this section or section 2929.32 of the Revised Code that have not been paid. (H) No financial sanction imposed under this section or section 2929.32 of the Revised Code shall preclude a victim from bringing a civil action against the offender. (I) If the court imposes restitution, fines, fees, or incarceration costs on a business or corporation, it is the duty of the person authorized to make disbursements from the assets of the business or corporation to pay the restitution, fines, fees, or incarceration costs from those assets. (J) If an offender is sentenced to pay restitution, a fine, fee, or incarceration costs, the clerk of the sentencing court, on request, shall make the offender's payment history available to the prosecutor, victim, victim's representative, victim's attorney, if applicable, the probation department, and the court without cost. Section 2. That existing sections 109.803, 955.54, 955.99, 959.131, 959.99, 2921.321, and 2929.18 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Section 959.99 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by both H.B. 281 and S.B. 164 of the 134th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.